Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1202.02
Carrying concealed handgun; consumption of alcohol or controlled substance; effect; applicability; violation; penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, a person not otherwise prohibited by state law from possessing or carrying a concealed handgun shall not carry a concealed handgun while such person:

(a) Is consuming alcohol; or

(b) Has remaining in such person's blood, urine, or breath any previously consumed alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in section 28-401.

(2) A person does not violate this section if the controlled substance in such person's blood, urine, or breath was lawfully obtained and was taken in therapeutically prescribed amounts.

(3) A person does not violate this section if:

(a) Such person is storing or transporting a handgun in a motor vehicle for any lawful purpose or transporting a handgun directly to or from a motor vehicle to or from any place where such handgun may be lawfully possessed or carried by such person; and

(b) Such handgun is unloaded, kept separate from ammunition, and enclosed in a case.

(4) This section does not apply to a qualified law enforcement officer or qualified retired law enforcement officer carrying a concealed handgun pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 926B or 926C, respectively, as such sections existed on January 1, 2023.

(5) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.

Laws 2023, LB77, § 10.